Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1455.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a definition to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Convenience store" shall mean a business that sells gasoline products in conjunction with a store that sells a range of everyday items such as coffee, groceries, snack foods, confectionery, soft drinks, tobacco products, over-the-counter drugs, toiletries, newspapers, magazines and other consumer products to customers.* * *Section 2. Sections 403 heading and (a) and 404 heading and (a) of the act are amended to read:Section 403. Applications for Hotel, Restaurant [and], Club Liquor and Convenience Store Licenses.--(a) Every applicant for a hotel liquor license, restaurant liquor license [or], club liquor or convenience store license or for the transfer of an existing license to another premises not then licensed or to another person shall file a written application with the board in such form and containing such information as the board shall from time to time prescribe, which shall be accompanied by a filing fee and an annual license fee as prescribed in section 614-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929." Every such application shall contain a description of that part of the hotel, restaurant [or], club or convenience store for which the applicant desires a license and shall set forth such other material information, description or plan of that part of the hotel, restaurant [or], club or convenience store where it is proposed to keep and sell liquor as may be required by the regulations of the board. The 20250HB1455PN1706 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 descriptions, information and plans referred to in this subsection shall show the hotel, restaurant, club, convenience store or the proposed location for the construction of a hotel, restaurant [or], club or convenience store, at the time the application is made, and shall show any alterations proposed to be made thereto, or the new building proposed to be constructed after the approval by the board of the application for a license or for the transfer of an existing license to another premises not then licensed or to another person. No physical alterations, improvements or changes shall be required to be made to any hotel, restaurant [or], club or convenience store, nor shall any new building for any such purpose, be required to be constructed until approval of the application for license or for the transfer of an existing license to another premises not then licensed or to another person by the board. After approval of the application, the licensee shall make the physical alterations, improvements and changes to the licensed premises, or shall construct the new building in the manner specified by the board at the time of approval, and the licensee shall not transact any business under the license until the board has approved the completed physical alterations, improvements and changes to the licensed premises, or the completed construction of the new building as conforming to the specifications required by the board at the time of issuance or transfer of the license, and is satisfied that the establishment is a restaurant, hotel [or], club or convenience store as defined by this act. The board may require that all such alterations or construction or conformity to definition be completed within six months from the time of issuance or transfer of the license. The time between the approval of the initial application and issuance of 20250HB1455PN1706 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operating authority to the licensee shall be considered as time in safekeeping. Failure to comply with these requirements shall be considered cause for revocation of the license. No such license shall be transferable between the time of issuance or transfer of the license and the approval of the completed alterations or construction by the board and full compliance by the licensee with the requirements of this act, unless the transfer application is accompanied by a surcharge. The surcharge shall be fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) if the license is located in a county of the first through third class. The surcharge shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000) if the license is located in a county of the fourth through eighth class.* * *Section 404. Issuance, Transfer or Extension of Hotel, Restaurant [and], Club Liquor and Convenience Store Liquor Licenses.--(a) Upon receipt of the application and the proper fees, and upon being satisfied of the truth of the statements in the application that the applicant and management company or companies, if any, are the only persons in any manner pecuniarily interested in the business so asked to be licensed and that no other person will be in any manner pecuniarily interested therein during the continuance of the license, except as hereinafter permitted, and that the applicant is a person of good repute, that the premises applied for meet all the requirements of this act and the regulations of the board, that the applicant seeks a license for a hotel, restaurant [or], club or convenience store, as defined in this act, and that the issuance of such license is not prohibited by any of the provisions of this act, the board shall, in the case of a hotel 20250HB1455PN1706 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [or], restaurant or convenience store, grant and issue to the applicant a liquor license, and in the case of a club may, in its discretion, issue or refuse a license: Provided, however, That in the case of any new license or the transfer of any license to a new location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area the board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse such new license, transfer or extension if such place proposed to be licensed is within three hundred feet of any church, hospital, charitable institution, school, or public playground, or if such new license, transfer or extension is applied for a place which is within two hundred feet of any other premises which is licensed by the board: And provided further, That the board's authority to refuse to grant a license because of its proximity to a church, hospital, charitable institution, public playground or other licensed premises shall not be applicable to license applications submitted for public venues [or], performing arts facilities[:] or convenience stores: And provided further, That the board's authority to refuse to grant a license because of its proximity to any other licensed premises shall not be applicable to license applications submitted for a convenience store liquor license: And provided further, That the board shall refuse any application for a new license, the transfer of any license to a new location or the extension of an existing license to cover an additional area if, in the board's opinion, such new license, transfer or extension would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the place proposed to be licensed: And provided further, That the board shall have the discretion to refuse a license to any person or to any 20250HB1455PN1706 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation, partnership or association if such person, or any officer or director of such corporation, or any member or partner of such partnership or association shall have been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the said license. The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question. If the board and the applicant enter into such an agreement, such agreement shall be binding on the applicant. Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 471 and for the nonrenewal of the license under section 470. If the board enters into an agreement with an applicant concerning additional restrictions, those restrictions shall be binding on subsequent holders of the license until the license is transferred to a new location or until the board enters into a subsequent agreement removing those restrictions. If the application in question involves a location previously licensed by the board, then any restrictions imposed by the board on the previous license at that location shall be binding on the applicant unless the board enters into a new agreement rescinding those restrictions. The board may, in its discretion, refuse an application for an economic development license under section 461(b.1) or an application for an intermunicipal transfer of a license if the board receives a protest from the governing body of the receiving municipality. The receiving municipality of an intermunicipal transfer or an economic development license under section 461(b.1) may file a protest against the transfer of a license into its municipality, and the receiving municipality shall have standing in a hearing to 20250HB1455PN1706 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 present testimony in support of or against the issuance or transfer of a license. Upon any opening in any quota, an application for a new license shall only be filed with the board for a period of six months following said opening.* * *Section 3. Sections 405, 407 and 431 of the act are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 405. License Fees.--* * *(b.1) License fees for a convenience store liquor license shall be graduated according to the population of the municipality as determined by the last preceding decennial census of the United States in which the convenience store is located, as prescribed under section 614-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."(b.2) Every applicant for a convenience store liquor license shall pay to the board a one-time license fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) with an annual renewal fee of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).* * *Section 407. Sale of Malt or Brewed Beverages by Liquor Licensees.--* * *(a.1) (1) Every liquor license issued to a convenience store under this subdivision (A) for the sale of beer shall authorize the licensee to sell malt or brewed beverages at the same places but subject to the same restrictions and penalties as apply to sales of liquor. Convenience store licensees are authorized to sell malt or brewed beverages for consumption off the premises and sold in quantities of not more than one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces in a single sale to one person. The 20250HB1455PN1706 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sales shall be made in closed containers.(2) If a convenience store liquor license holder has an interior connection to another business that it operates, the convenience store liquor license holder may use one or more of the registers in the other business to sell malt or brewed beverages for off-premises consumption under the following conditions:(i) the building is eleven thousand square feet or less;(ii) the registers are located in the same building as the licensed premises;(iii) the registers comply with the signage, staffing, training, carding, scanning and prohibition on the sharing of data provisions of section 415(a)(8) and (9); and(iv) the board has been provided notice of compliance with this paragraph by the convenience store liquor license holder, including square footage of the building and the location of the specific registers to be used prior to their use.(3) The registers used under paragraph (2) shall be deemed to be licensed areas but no formal application beyond notice to the board shall be required.* * *Section 431. Malt and Brewed Beverages Manufacturers', Distributors' and Importing Distributors' Licenses.--* * *(b.2) The board shall issue to any reputable person who applies therefor, and pays the license fee hereinafter prescribed, a convenience store liquor license for the place which such person desires to maintain for the sale of malt or brewed beverages, not for consumption on the premises where sold, and in quantities of not more than one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces in a single sale to one person. The board shall 20250HB1455PN1706 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have the discretion to refuse a license to any person or to any corporation, partnership or association if such person, or any officer or director of such corporation, or any member or partner of such partnership or association shall have been convicted or found guilty of a felony within a period of five years immediately preceding the date of application for the said license: And provided further, That, in the case of any new license or the transfer of any license to a new location, the board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse such new license or transfer if such place proposed to be licensed is within three hundred feet of any church, hospital, charitable institution, school or public playground: And provided further, That the board shall refuse any application for a new license or the transfer of any license to a new location if, in the board's opinion, such new license or transfer would be detrimental to the welfare, health, peace and morals of the inhabitants of the neighborhood within a radius of five hundred feet of the place proposed to be licensed. If the application in question involves a location previously licensed by the board, then any restrictions imposed by the board on the previous license at that location shall be binding on the applicant unless the board enters into a new agreement rescinding those restrictions. The board shall require notice to be posted on the property or premises upon which the licensee or proposed licensee will engage in sales of malt or brewed beverages. This notice shall be similar to the notice required of hotel, restaurant and club liquor licensees.Except as hereinafter provided, such convenience store liquor license shall authorize the holder thereof to sell or deliver malt or brewed beverages in quantities not more than one hundred 20250HB1455PN1706 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ninety-two fluid ounces in a single sale to one person anywhere within this Commonwealth, which have been purchased from manufacturers or persons outside this Commonwealth engaged in the legal sale of malt or brewed beverages or from manufacturers or importing distributors licensed under this article.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1455PN1706 - 10 - 1234567